Montana, session 2025, HB371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Administration of gene-based vaccines FOR INFECTIOUS DISEASES. (1)
A person may not provide or administer a gene-based vaccine FOR INFECTIOUS DISEASES to a human within the
state.
(2) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and is subject to a $500 fine for
each incident.
(3) The appropriate licensure board within the Montana department of labor and industry shall
review the license of a person who is licensed under Title 37 and who violates this section.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 371

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0371.2
(4) (A) For the purposes of this section, "gene-based vaccine FOR INFECTIOUS DISEASES" means a
vaccine FOR INFECTIOUS DISEASES developed using messenger ribonucleic acid (mRNA) technology, modified
messenger ribonucleic acid technology, self-amplifying messenger ribonucleic acid technology, or
deoxyribonucleic acid technology.
(B) THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE GENE THERAPY PRODUCTS USED TO TREAT CANCER OR GENETIC
DISORDERS.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 45, chapter 5, and the provisions of Title 45, chapter 5, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 371